Washington statutes.
RCW 4.14.020

Petition for removal—Contents—Filing—Notice.

(1) A defendant or defendants desiring to remove any civil action from a justice court as authorized by RCW 4.14.010 shall file in the superior court in the county where such action is pending, a verified petition containing a short and plain statement of the facts which entitle him, her, or them to removal together with a copy of all process, pleadings and orders served upon him, her, or them in such action.

(2) The petition for removal of a civil action or proceeding shall be filed within twenty days after the receipt by the defendant, through service or otherwise, of a copy of the initial pleading setting forth the claim for relief upon which such action or proceeding is based.

If the case stated by the initial pleading is not removable, a petition for removal may be filed within twenty days after receipt by the defendant, through service or otherwise, of a copy of an amended pleading, motion, order, or other paper, including the defendant's answer, from which it may first be ascertained that the case is or has become removable.

(3) Promptly after the filing of such petition the defendant or defendants shall give written notice thereof to all adverse parties and shall file a copy of the petition with the justice court, which shall effect the removal and the justice court shall proceed no further unless and until the case is remanded.

[ 2011 c 336 s 81; 1967 ex.s. c 46 s 5.]